Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-15] Confinement in jails.
Persons confined other than in a guardhouse, whether before, during, or after
trial by a military court, shall be confined in state correctional facilities
designated by the governor or by such person as the governor may authorize to
act. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next